Massachusetts, session 194th, S102.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 93 of chapter 143 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following definitions after the fifth 
paragraph:-  
“Universal changing station”, an adult sized changing table designed to hold at least 
350lbs that is located within an enclosed restroom facility that is for use by persons of any age 
who require assistance with diapering and is accessible by persons of any sex. 
"State owned and maintained”, a building with a public bathroom belonging to, funded 
by, and controlled by the commonwealth of Massachusetts, its political subdivisions, and its 
public authorities and other public instrumentalities. 
SECTION 2. Said section 93 of said chapter 143 is hereby further amended by adding the 
following paragraph after the definitions:- Any state owned and maintained public building or 

of 4 12 place of public accommodation containing a public toilet room that is newly constructed, 
reconstructed or remodeled on or after January 1, 2027 shall install and maintain at least one 
universal changing station. The bathroom shall be conspicuously marked as containing a public 
universal size changing table. The changing table shall be capable of supporting a minimum of 
350 pounds and providing a changing surface of 70 inches minimum in length and 30 inches 
minimum in width. The changing surface height shall be adjustable at variable heights from 17 
inches minimum to 38 inches maximum above the floor as measured to the top of the changing 
surface. 
SECTION 3. Said section 93 of said chapter 143 is hereby further amended by adding the 
following after the sixth paragraph:- The board shall adopt regulations regarding the requirement 
that any state owned and maintained public building that is newly constructed, reconstructed or 
remodeled on or after January 1, 2027 install and maintain at least one universal changing 
station.  
(a) The regulations adopted by the board shall be aligned with the specifications 
determined in the 2024 International Building Code (IBC) section 1110.4, Adult Changing 
Stations and the International Code Council A117.1 Supplement 1: Standard for Accessible and 
Usable Buildings and Facilities; Section 613: Adult Changing Stations. These include but are not 
limited to:  
(1) a requirement that the entrance to each universal changing station has conspicuous 
signage indicating the location of the station; 
(2) a requirement that if a public building has a central directory, said central directory 
must indicate the location of the universal changing station;  

of 4 34  (3) a requirement for signage indicating the weight capacity and instructions for operation 
of the changing station within the room; 
(4) a requirement that all universal changing stations shall: 
(A) be equipped with a height-adjustable changing table capable of supporting a 
minimum of 350 pounds and providing a changing surface of 70 inches minimum in length and 
30 inches minimum in width. The changing surface height shall be adjustable at variable heights 
from 17 inches minimum to 38 inches maximum above the floor as measured to the top of the 
changing surface; 
(B) provide safety features of sidebar rails and safety belts; 
(C) be located inside a private restroom or in a private stall, enclosed area or privacy 
screen within a multi-stall restroom; 
(D) provide adequate space for assistance, following the IBC guidelines for end and side 
clearance; and 
(E) comply with all requirements of the Federal Americans with Disabilities Act; 
(5) any other issues regarding implementation that the board deems appropriate. 
(b) If the board determines that the inclusion of a wall mounted, adjustable height 
universal changing table is not feasible or would destroy historic significance of a historic 
property, the board may allow instead for the placement of a freestanding, mobile, height-
adjustable universal changing table. 

of 4 53  (c) The board may grant an exemption from the requirements of this section if it 
determines:   
(1) the installation would create a condition that does not comply with the Americans 
with Disabilities Act standards for access for persons with disabilities.   
(2) the cost of the proposed reconstruction or remodeling without the inclusion of a 
changing table does not exceed $10,000.